Arkansas, session 2025, SB412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 10-3-309(b)(1)(B), concerning the items not
included in the definition of "rule" as used in relation to the legislative
review and approval of state agency rules, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(vi) A proclamation issued by the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration under § 26-51-423(a)(2).

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-15-202(9)(B), concerning the items not
included in the definition of "rule" under the Arkansas Administrative
Procedure Act, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
*JLL093*
03/10/2025 7:49:54 AM JLL093

SB412
(ix) A proclamation issued by the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration under § 26-51-423(a)(2).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-51-403(b)(8), concerning deductions from
gross income, is amended to read as follows:
(8) Deductions for moving expenses, as set forth in § 26-51-
423(a)(4) 26-51-423(a)(1)(C);

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-51-423(a), concerning income tax
deductions for expenses, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) In computing net income, there shall be allowed as deductions
the following expenses:
(1)(A) Business Expenses. All of 26 U.S.C. § 162, except
subsection (n), as in effect on January 1, 2019, regarding trade or business
expenses, is adopted for the purpose of computing Arkansas income tax
liability;
(2)(B) Medical and Dental Expenses. Title 26 U.S.C. §
213, as in effect on January 1, 2011, is adopted in computing the medical and
dental expense deduction under the state income tax law; and
(3) Travel Expenses. In determining travel expenses deductible
as a business expense in computing net income as provided under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section, the deduction for vehicle miles shall be determined
by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration under his or
her regulatory authority in § 26-18-301; and
(4)(C) Moving Expenses. Title 26 U.S.C. § 217, as in
effect on January 1, 2011, regarding the deduction of moving expenses, is
adopted for the purpose of computing Arkansas income tax liability.
(2)(A) In determining travel and transportation expenses
deductible under this subsection in computing net income, the amount of the
per-mile deduction for vehicle miles shall be determined by proclamation of
the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(B) The amount of the per-mile deduction allowed under
this subsection shall not exceed one dollar ($1.00) per mile.
(C) The secretary shall:
(i) Set the amount of the per-mile deduction allowed
under this subsection as close to the amount of the per-mile deduction for
03/10/2025 7:49:54 AM JLL093

SB412
vehicle miles most recently established by the Internal Revenue Service as is
fiscally responsible without causing an undue hardship on taxpayers; and
(ii) Issue a proclamation under subdivision
(a)(2)(A) of this section no later than thirty (30) days after the per-mile
deduction for vehicle miles established by the Internal Revenue Service is
changed.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-51-423(c)(3), concerning income tax
deductions for expenses for a self-employed taxpayer, is amended to read as
follows:
(3) Any amount paid by the taxpayer for insurance to which this
subsection applies shall not be taken into account in computing the amount
allowable to the taxpayer as a deduction under subdivision (a)(2) (a)(1)(B)
of this section.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-51-423(g)(1), concerning income tax
deductions for expenses, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) A deduction pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section
for interest or intangible-related expenses paid by the taxpayer to a related
party shall be allowed only if:
(A) The interest or intangible-related income received by
the related party is subject to income tax imposed by the State of Arkansas,
another state, or a foreign government that has entered into a comprehensive
income tax treaty with the United States;
(B) The interest or intangible-related income received by
the related party was received pursuant to:
(i) An “arm's length” contract or at an “arm's
length” rate of interest; and
(ii) A transaction not intended to avoid the payment
of Arkansas income tax otherwise due;
(C) The taxpayer and the secretary enter into a written
agreement prior to the due date of the taxpayer's Arkansas income tax return:
(i) Authorizing the taxpayer to take the deduction
for the tax year at issue; or
(ii) Requiring the use of an alternative method of
income apportionment by the taxpayer for the tax year at issue; or
03/10/2025 7:49:54 AM JLL093

SB412
(D) During the taxable year, the related party recipient
of interest or intangible-related income, in a location not described in
subdivision (g)(1)(A) of this section, a “non-tax location”:
(i) Operates an active trade or business in the non-
tax location;
(ii) Has a minimum of fifty (50) full-time-
equivalent employees in the non-tax location;
(iii) Owns real or tangible personal property with a
fair market value in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) located in
the non-tax location; and
(iv) Has revenues generated from sources within the
non-tax location in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 26-51-437(b)(1) and (2), concerning the
itemized deductions not included in the definition of "miscellaneous itemized
deductions", are amended to read as follows:
(1) The deduction allowed under § 26-51-423(a)(1)(A) relating to
expenses in carrying on a trade or business. However, employee business
expenses which are not reimbursed by the employer are miscellaneous itemized
deductions;
(2) The deduction allowed under § 26-51-423(a)(2) 26-51-
423(a)(1)(B) relating to medical, dental, drug, and related healthcare
expenses;













03/10/2025 7:49:54 AM JLL093